Hawaii statutes.
[§420D-2] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Benefit director" means the director
designated as the benefit director of a sustainable business corporation under
section 420D-7.

"Benefit officer" means the
individual designated as the benefit officer of a sustainable business
corporation under section 420D-9.

"General public benefit" means a
material positive impact on society and the environment, taken as a whole and
as measured by a third-party standard under section 420D-12, from the business
and operations of a sustainable business corporation.

"Independent" means having no
material relationship with a sustainable business corporation or any of its
subsidiaries.

"Material owner" means a shareholder
who holds either beneficially or of record five per cent or more of the
outstanding shares of a sustainable business corporation.

"Material relationship" means a
relationship between a person and a sustainable business corporation where:

(1) The person is, or has been within the last three
years, an employee other than a benefit officer of the sustainable business
corporation or any of its subsidiaries;

(2) The person is related by blood, marriage, or
adoption to; is a party to a civil union with; is a reciprocal beneficiary or
household member of; or resides with an officer other than a benefit officer or
director of the sustainable business corporation or any of its subsidiaries; or

(3) The person or an association of which the person
is a director, officer, or manager or in which the person owns beneficially or
of record five per cent or more of the outstanding equity interests or the
outstanding shares of the sustainable business corporation; provided that
percentage ownership in an association shall be calculated as if all
outstanding rights to acquire equity interests in the association had been
exercised.

"Minimum status vote" means that in
addition to any other approval or vote required by this chapter or the bylaws
adopted by the shareholders:

(1) The holders of shares of every class or series
shall be entitled to vote on the corporate action regardless of any limitation
stated in the articles of incorporation or bylaws on the voting rights of any
class or series; and

(2) The corporate action shall be approved by vote of
the shareholders of each class or series entitled to cast at least two-thirds
of the votes that all shareholders of the class or series are entitled to cast
thereon.

"Subsidiary" of a person means an
association in which the person owns beneficially or of record fifty per cent
or more of the outstanding equity interests; provided that a percentage of
ownership in an association shall be calculated as if all outstanding rights to
acquire equity interests in the association had been exercised.

"Sustainable business corporation"
means a domestic corporation, incorporated under chapter 414, that has elected
to also become subject to this chapter and whose status as a sustainable
business corporation has not been terminated as provided in this chapter.

"Third-party standard" means a
standard for defining, reporting, and assessing overall corporate social and
environmental performance that conforms to the requirements of this chapter. [L
2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next